Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1641.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 747.1. Adverse actions against legal reproductive health care.(a) Prohibition.--An insurer providing medical professional 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 liability insurance shall be prohibited from taking an adverse action against a health care provider solely on the basis that the health care provider provides reproductive health care services that are permitted under the laws of this Commonwealth on an out-of-State patient. This subsection shall apply to a health care provider that prescribes medication permitted under the laws of this Commonwealth to terminate a pregnancy to an out-of-State patient by means of telemedicine.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adverse action." The term includes any of the following:(1) Refusing to renew or execute a contract or an agreement with a health care provider.(2) Making a report to an appropriate private or governmental entity regarding the practices of the health care provider which may violate laws relating to reproductive health care services in other states.(3) Increasing a charge for or reducing or making another adverse or unfavorable change in the terms of coverage or amount for a medical professional liability contract or agreement with a health care provider."Reproductive health care services." Medical, surgical, counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services relating to pregnancy, contraception or the termination of pregnancy.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1641PN1991 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627